District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.76

POWER — Participation in activities to assist in achieving self-sufficiency.

(a)

Following a preliminary assessment by the Mayor under TANF and a medical review, a person who has been determined to meet the eligibility criteria of § 4-205.72 shall be required, as a condition of eligibility for POWER benefits, to participate in activities that will assist the recipient in achieving self-sufficiency. The Mayor shall determine the nature, scope, amount and duration of the activities based on the medical review and the preliminary assessment.

(b)

The Mayor shall promulgate rules establishing the nature and scope of the activities and the amount and duration of participation that may be required of a POWER recipient.

(c)

Participation in activities required under this section shall not confer to the participant any entitlement to child care. The Mayor may provide access to publicly-funded child care to a POWER recipient if necessary for the recipient to participate in self-sufficiency activities.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 576
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(g), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.76.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(h) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
See notes to § 4-205.69.